Hawaii, session 2026, SB339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 346D-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d) The needs allowance is not intended to replace or affect the funds received from the federal supplemental security income program or funds received as a state supplemental payment for domiciliary care pursuant to section 346-53(c), and shall be supplemental to any funds provided to a recipient by the federal supplemental security income program[.] or as a state supplemental payment for domiciliary care made pursuant to section 346‑53(c)." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________